Hawaii statutes.
§463-5 Private detectives and detective
agencies; license required. (a) No individual shall engage in the
business of private detective, represent oneself to be, hold oneself out as,
list oneself, or advertise as a private detective or as furnishing detective or
investigating services without first obtaining a license as a private detective
from the board and paying the application and license fees.

(b) No firm shall engage in the business of
private detective, represent itself to be, hold itself out as, list itself as,
or advertise as a private detective agency or as furnishing detective or
investigating services without first obtaining a license as a private detective
agency from the board and paying the application and license fees. A detective
agency shall have in its employ at least one principal detective who shall be
fully responsible for the direct management and control of the detective agency
and the agency's employees when detective services are being provided. [L 1961,
c 77, pt of §1; Supp, §165A-5; HRS §463-5; am L 1983, c 40, §2; am L 1984, c 7,
§68; am L 1987, c 57, §2; am L 1994, c 122, §2; am L 2004, c 94, §4; am L 2006,
c 13, §1]

Case Notes

License not transferable. 66 H. 607, 671 P.2d 446 (1983).

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next